Missouri, session 2026, HB3135.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 160.674, to read as follows:
160.674. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Authority having jurisdiction", an organization, office, agency, or
individual responsible for enforcing the requirements under this section;
(2) "NFPA 101", the Life Safety Code published by the National Fire Protection
Association, which includes the NFPA 80 Standards for Fire Doors and Other Opening
Protectives;
(3) "Protective door assembly" or "protective door assemblies", any of the
following:
(a) Doors with panic hardware or fire exit hardware;
(b) Door assemblies in exit enclosures;
(c) Electricity controlled egress doors; and
(d) Door assemblies with special locking arrangements, such as delayed egress,
sensor release egress doors, and elevator lobby doors;
(4) "Qualified inspector", a person who, by possession of a recognized degree,
certificate, professional standing, or skill, and who, by knowledge, training, and
experience, has demonstrated the ability to deal with the subject matter, the work, or the
project;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3135 2
(5) "School board", the same as defined in section 160.011;
(6) "School building", a structure used for the instruction of students by a school
governing authority.
2. Each school board in this state shall:
(1) Cause all protective door assemblies in school buildings used by the school
board for instruction of students to be inspected and tested every twelve months in
accordance with subsection 3 of this section; and
(2) Verify that such protective door assemblies are in compliance with the
following standards:
(a) If the protective door assembly was installed in 2015 or after, the 2015 NFPA
101; or
(b) If the protective door assembly was installed prior to 2015, the NFPA 101
that was in effect on the date the protective door assembly was installed or, if the
protective door assembly was installed before the NFPA 101 was published and in effect,
the building code standards in effect at the time of installation.
3. (1) A school board shall cause all of the protective door assemblies in school
buildings used for the instruction of students to be inspected and tested every twelve
months by a qualified inspector to confirm proper operation and full closure.
(2) If a protective door assembly is not in compliance with the applicable
standards described in subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section, the school board
shall take all steps necessary to make the protective door assembly compliant.
4. After the inspection of a protective door assembly in a school building, the
qualified inspector shall provide a report to the school board indicating any of the
following:
(1) That the protective door assembly is in compliance with the applicable
standards described in subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section and no further
inspection is required respecting that protective door assembly for the next twelve
months;
(2) That the protective door assembly is not in compliance with the applicable
standards; or
(3) That the protective door assembly is not in compliance with the applicable
standards and there is a serious risk for fire or life safety hazard.
5. Each school board shall maintain records verifying annual inspections.
6. If one or more protective door assemblies in a school building are not in
compliance with the applicable standards described in subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of
this section, as indicated in a report under subsection 4 or 7 of this section, the school
board shall do both of the following:

HB 3135 3
(1) Take all steps necessary to make each such protective door assembly
compliant with the applicable standards; and
(2) Cause another inspection of each such protective door assembly immediately
after completing those steps.
7. After each inspection of a protective door assembly in the school building
under subsection 6 of this section has been completed, the qualified inspector shall
provide a report to the school governing authority indicating any of the following:
(1) That the protective door assembly is in compliance with the applicable
standards described in subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section and no further
inspection is required respecting that protective door assembly for the next twelve
months;
(2) That the protective door assembly is not in compliance with the applicable
standards; or
(3) That the protective door assembly is not in compliance with the applicable
standards and there is a serious risk for fire or life safety hazard.
8. (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, the authority having jurisdiction shall
annually cause an inspection of the records retained by each school board under
subsection 5 of this section. If a protective door assembly in a school building is not fully
compliant with the applicable standards within eighteen months after a report issued
under subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 4 of this section, or within one hundred eighty
days after a report issued under subdivision (3) of subsection 4 of this section, and the
school board is not actively taking steps to achieve compliance, the authority having
jurisdiction shall issue a citation to the school board. Each protective door assembly
that is not in compliance with the applicable standards, and which the respective school
board is not actively taking steps to achieve compliance with those standards, is a
separate violation and is subject to an additional citation.
(2) If a citation is issued under subdivision (1) of this subsection, the school
governing authority shall post the citation issued concerning the protective door
assembly on a public web site managed by the school board. The school governing
authority may remove the citation posted under this division once the protective door
assembly is made compliant with the applicable standards and an inspection confirms
such compliance.
9. No authority having jurisdiction shall do either of the following:
(1) Issue a citation under subsection 8 of this section to a school governing
authority that is actively taking steps to reach compliance with the applicable standards,
regardless of whether full compliance is reached for all protective door assemblies in the
school building; or

HB 3135 4
(2) Assess a civil penalty or any fine associated with a citation issued under
subsection 8 of this section.
10. A qualified inspector that inspects more than one protective door assembly
under subsection 4 or 7 of this section in the same school building may combine the
results of such inspections into one report, so long as the report clearly indicates which
protective door assemblies are in compliance with the applicable standards and which
are not.
11. Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a temporary door-locking
100 device in compliance with the rules adopted by the state fire marshal is not in conflict
101 with this section.
102 12. The department, in coordination with the state fire marshal, may promulgate
103 all necessary rules and regulations for the administration of this section. The rules shall
104 require that protective door assemblies are inspected in accordance with this section and
105 that the protective door assemblies continue to meet the compliance standards required
106 at the time of installation. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
107 section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
108 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
109 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
110 and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
111 review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
112 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
113 adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔